prince/dictionaries/lv-LV.aff
#127
PFX  Y 2
PFX    0  iz   .
PFX    0  neiz   .

#128
PFX € Y 1
PFX €   0  ne   .

#129
PFX  Y 2
PFX    0  no   .
PFX    0  neno   .

#130
PFX ‚ Y 2
PFX ‚   0  pa   .
PFX ‚   0  nepa   .

#131
PFX ƒ Y 2
PFX ƒ   0  pâr  .
PFX ƒ   0  nepâr  .

#132
PFX „ Y 2
PFX „   0  pie   .
PFX „   0  nepie   .

#133
PFX … Y 2
PFX …   0  sa   .
PFX …   0  nesa   .

#134
PFX † Y 2
PFX †   0  uz   .
PFX †   0  neuz   .

#146
PFX ’ Y 1
PFX ’   0  jâaiz   .

PFX “ Y 1
PFX “   0  jâap   .

PFX ” Y 1
PFX ”   0  jâat   .

PFX • Y 1
PFX •   0  jâie   .

#150
PFX – Y 1
PFX –   0  jâiz   .

PFX — Y 1
PFX —   0  jâno   .

PFX ˜ Y 1
PFX ˜   0  jâpa   .

PFX ™ Y 1
PFX ™   0  jâpâr   .

PFX š Y 1
PFX š   0  jâpie   .

PFX › Y 1
PFX ›   0  jâsa   .

PFX œ Y 1
PFX œ   0  jâuz   .

PFX  Y 1
PFX    0  bez    .

PFX  Y 1
PFX    0  caur   .

PFX Ÿ Y 1
PFX Ÿ   0  lîdz   .

#160
PFX   Y 1
PFX     0  pret   .

PFX ¡ Y 1
PFX ¡   0  starp  .

PFX ¢ Y 1
PFX ¢   0  anti   .

PFX £ Y 1
PFX £   0  inter   .

PFX ¤ Y 1
PFX ¤   0  kontra   .

PFX ¥ Y 1
PFX ¥   0  super   .

PFX ¦ Y 1
PFX ¦   0  ultra   .

PFX § Y 1
PFX §   0  hiper   .

PFX ¨ Y 1
PFX ¨   0  kvazi   .

PFX © Y 1
PFX ©   0  pseido   .

#170
PFX ª Y 1
PFX ª   0  mili   .

PFX « Y 1
PFX «   0  mega   .

PFX ¬ Y 1
PFX ¬   0  kilo   .

PFX ­ Y 1
PFX ­   0  mikro   .

PFX ® Y 1
PFX ®   0  giga   .

PFX ¯ Y 1
PFX ¯   0  tera   .

PFX ° Y 1
PFX °   0  nano   .

PFX ± Y 1
PFX ±   0  piko   .

PFX ² Y 1
PFX ²   0  apakğ   .

PFX ³ Y 1
PFX ³   0  âr   .

#180
PFX ´ Y 1
PFX ´   0  iekğ   .

PFX µ Y 1
PFX µ   0  pakaï   .

PFX ¶ Y 1
PFX ¶   0  pçc   .

PFX · Y 1
PFX ·   0  pirms   .

PFX ¸ Y 1
PFX ¸   0  priekğ   .

PFX ¹ Y 1
PFX ¹   0  virs   .

PFX º Y 1
PFX º   0  zem   .
